Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,111
Credential; disciplinary action because of physical or mental disability; duration; when issued, returned, or reinstated; manner.

(1) The denial, refusal of renewal, limitation, or suspension of a credential as provided in section 38-1,110 shall continue in effect until reversed on appeal pursuant to section 38-1,113 or until the cause of such denial, refusal of renewal, limitation, or suspension no longer exists and the appropriate board finds, upon competent examination or evaluation by a qualified physician or other qualified professional selected or approved by the department, that the applicant or credential holder is qualified to engage in the practice of the profession. The cost of the examination or evaluation shall be paid by the applicant or credential holder.

(2) Upon such finding the director, notwithstanding the provision of any other statute, shall issue, return, or reinstate such credential or remove any limitation on such credential if the applicant or credential holder is otherwise qualified as determined by the appropriate board to practice or to continue in the practice of the profession.

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 19;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 66;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 58;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 43;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 394;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 50;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-161.14;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 316;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 111.